Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275.06
Plat of city or village lots; validity.

When any plat of city or village lots in this state has been filed of record on or before January 1, 1937, and has not been vacated, it shall be conclusively presumed that the person filing such plat was, on the date of filing thereof, the owner, in fee simple, of the real estate described therein, free and clear of any liens or encumbrances of any kind unless action on any claimed lien or encumbrance is brought within one year from September 28, 1959. Whenever, after September 28, 1959, any plat of city or village lots in this state has been filed of record, accompanied by an affidavit of the person so filing setting forth the liens or encumbrances, if any, against such real estate, it shall be conclusively presumed that such person was the owner thereof, in fee simple, subject only to the liens or encumbrances disclosed by such affidavit unless, within twenty-three years after the filing thereof, an action is brought on any other claimed lien or encumbrance.

Laws 1959, c. 349, § 1, p. 1236.